Utah statutes.
11-36a-501.   Notice of intent to prepare an impact fee facilities plan.

(1)  Before preparing or amending an impact fee facilities plan, a local political subdivision or private entity shall provide written notice of its intent to prepare or amend an impact fee facilities plan.

(2)  A notice required under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  indicate that the local political subdivision or private entity intends to prepare or amend an impact fee facilities plan;

(b)  describe or provide a map of the geographic area where the proposed impact fee facilities will be located; and

(c)  subject to Subsection (3), be posted on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701.

(3)  For a private entity required to post notice on the Utah Public Notice Website under Subsection (2)(c):

(a)  the private entity shall give notice to the general purpose local government in which the private entity's private business office is located; and

(b)  the general purpose local government described in Subsection (3)(a) shall post the notice on the Utah Public Notice Website.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

